Wisconsin, session 2025, SB532.
do enact as follows:SB532,1cSection 1c. 36.11 (59) of the statutes is created to read:36.11 (59) Disclosure of course format. (a) In this subsection, “course format” means any of the following:1. The course is offered exclusively for in-person attendance.2. The course is offered exclusively for online attendance.3. Course attendance is hybrid, requiring both in-person and online attendance at different times during the semester or session.(b) The board shall ensure that, at the time an institution first publishes a listing of courses offered for a semester or session, the institution discloses the course format for each course listed. Subject to par. (c), the institution shall promptly update a course listing if the course format changes.(c) An institution may not change a course format after the enrollment period for the course begins.SB532,1mSection 1m. 36.27 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:36.27 (1) (a) Subject to par. pars. (b) and (c), the board may establish for different classes of students differing tuition and fees incidental to enrollment in educational programs or use of facilities in the system. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board may charge any student who is not exempted by this section a nonresident tuition. The board may establish special rates of tuition and fees for the extension and summer sessions and such other studies or courses of instruction as the board deems advisable.SB532,2Section 2. 36.27 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:36.27 (1) (c) The board shall ensure that no student is charged an incidental or supplemental fee for enrolling in a course offered exclusively online unless any of the following applies:1. The fee is charged to cover actual costs incurred by an institution that are specifically attributable to offering the course online and that would not be incurred by the institution if students attended the course in person.2. The fee is also charged for enrolling in an equivalent course offered for in-person attendance.SB532,3Section 3. Initial applicability.(1) The treatment of s. 36.27 (1) (a) and (c) first applies to the first semester or session beginning at least 30 days after the effective date of this subsection.(2) The treatment of s. 36.11 (59) first applies to the first semester or session beginning at least 90 days after the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb532 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb532 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB532 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB532 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB532: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting